Alabama, session 2026rs, SB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 45-2-244.134, Code of Alabama 1975,
is amended to read as follows:
"§45-2-244.134
The proceeds from the tax authorized, less the amount
or percentage of the actual cost of collection as may be
agreed upon by the Commissioner of the Department of Revenue
and the Baldwin County Commission, shall be distributed to the
Baldwin County Commission to be allocated on an annual basis
each fiscal year as follows:
(1) The first eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) of the
funds or portion received pursuant to this subpart shall be
equally divided among the rescue squads authorized by the
county commission. Each of the recipient rescue squads shall
be a Baldwin County recognized quasi-public entity, as defined
Page 1

be a Baldwin County recognized quasi-public entity, as defined
SB349 INTRODUCED
in Section 45-2-142.01, and a member in good standing with the
Alabama Association of Rescue Squads, Inc. Notwithstanding the
foregoing, any rescue squad receiving ad valorem tax funds
pursuant to Section 45-2-242 shall be excluded from the
distribution in this section regardless of the other
requirements being met.
(2) The next forty thousand dollars ($40,000) of the
funds or portion received pursuant to this subpart shall be
distributed to the office of the District Attorney of Baldwin
County for the creation and maintenance of a sexual assault
nurse examiner program.
(3) The remainder of the funds received pursuant to
this subpart shall be distributed to the office of the
District Attorney of Baldwin County."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2